Rhode Island, session 2025, SB639.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Title 16 of the General Laws entitled "EDUCATION" is hereby amended by
adding thereto the following chapter:
CHAPTER 117
THE SCHOOL LIBRARIES ACT
16-117-1. Short title.
This chapter shall be known and may be cited as the "The School Libraries Act".
16-117-2. Statement of policy.
(a) The general assembly hereby declares the following to be the policy of this state:
(1) School libraries, with well-funded programs, are essential to schools as research
consistently shows that students become better readers and read more when they are provided with
a wide variety of reading materials from which they can select to read. School librarians are trained
experts and are highly qualified to provide dynamic book collections meeting all reading levels and
spanning a variety of interests that allow students to choose their reading materials. School libraries
and school librarians foster a love of reading and a love of learning that enables students to become
life-long learners.
(2) School libraries and school librarians are essential in the instruction of information
literacy and media literacy in the age of limitless information sources, social media, misinformation
and disinformation. School librarians teach students to identify, evaluate and use information in
order to become competent researchers and ethical consumers and users of information.

(3) In order to be college and career ready in the twenty first century, students shall have
access to and be able to use information resources including books, digital media, web resources,
databases, and technology vetted by school librarians. Library programs provide equitable
opportunity for all students to be able to read, locate, evaluate and interpret information accurately
for academic and professional success.
(4) Research consistently demonstrates that in schools with well-equipped and well-
stocked school libraries staffed by certified school librarians, students achieve higher scores on
standardized reading tests, have higher graduation rates, and enjoy learning more even when taking
demographics into consideration.
16-117-3. Definitions.
As used in this chapter, the following terms shall have the following meanings unless a
different meaning is clearly indicated by the context:
(1) "Commissioner” means the commissioner of elementary and secondary education.
(2) “Information literacy” means a set of abilities requiring individuals to recognize when
information is needed and have the ability to locate, evaluate, and use effectively the needed
information.
(3) “Media literacy” means the ability to critically analyze stories presented in the mass
media and to determine their accuracy or credibility.
(4) “Public schools” means all public schools of any city or town in the state. This term
also includes all charter public schools, including district charter schools, independent charter
schools, and mayoral academies, and vocational schools.
(5) “School librarian” means a teaching professional who is certified by the department of
elementary and secondary education as an all grades library media teacher who is hired to run a
school library. This position may also be known as a school library media specialist.
(6) “School library” means a permanent facility in a public school that is available to the
entire school community and that contains learning and information resources and reading
materials in print and non-print media that is maintained and supervised by a certified school
librarian. This facility may also be known as a school library media center or library commons.
16-117-4. A school library in each public school.
(a) Pursuant to §16-1-5(7), the commissioner shall ensure that every public school in Rhode
Island has a school library in a permanent and dedicated space.
(b) A school library shall include the following essential elements, as determined by
professional standards:
(1) A collection of books and reading materials that is adequate in size for the student
LC002288 - Page 2 of 5

population of the school in order that every student is offered a range of choices to meet their
reading interests and reading level and that also supports the teaching and learning priorities of the
school;
(2) Appropriate space for students to read and study comfortably and for instruction to
occur;
(3) Adequate technology for students to utilize to access information resources, complete
school assignments and produce original work;
(4) An automated system for the management of the library collection; and
(5) An adequate budget for library materials in order that they are kept up to date and in
good condition.
16-117-5. A certified school librarian assigned to every public school.
(a) Pursuant to §16-1-5(7), the commissioner shall ensure that every public school in Rhode
Island has a certified school librarian to manage and maintain the library, provide information
resources to students and staff, promote reading and teach information literacy skills.
(b) All public schools in Rhode Island with populations of two hundred fifty (250) students
or more shall have at least one full-time certified school librarian who is dedicated to administering
and supervising the school library. Public schools with fewer than two hundred fifty (250) students
shall have at least a half-time certified school librarian who is dedicated to administering and
supervising the school library.
(c) The requirements of this section shall be phased in as follows:
(1) By the 2026-27 school year: All high schools shall have at least one full-time, certified
school librarian;
(2) By the 2028-29 school year: All high schools and middle schools shall have at least one
full-time, certified school librarian; and
(3) By the 2030-2031 school year: All schools kindergarten through grade twelve (K-12),
shall have at least one full-time, certified school librarian.
16-117-6. Student access to the school library and its resources.
(a) Pursuant to §16-1-5(7), the commissioner shall ensure that public schools shall provide
students with access to the school library on a daily basis in order that students are aware of when
and how they are allowed to go to the library for book selection, reading, independent work, and
related activities.
(b) The provision set forth in subsection (a) of this section shall be required for all levels,
kindergarten through grade twelve (K-12), and shall include time other than “library class” time or
scheduled research class time.
LC002288 - Page 3 of 5

(c) School librarians shall be available during this open library time.
(d) Secondary schools shall provide access to students beyond the school day. This access
may include before-school, after-school and/or Saturday hours.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC002288
========
LC002288 - Page 4 of 5